Georgia statutes. TITLE 32 Highways, Bridges, and Ferries
Article 2 State Public Transportation Fund

Administrative rules and regulations.

Grant programs, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, State Department of Transportation, Chapter 672-12.

32-5-20.
“State Public Transportation Fund” defined.

As used in this article, the term “State Public Transportation Fund” means that money the expenditures of which are controlled and supervised by the department by virtue of paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of Code Section 32-2-2.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-703, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

Cross references.

Motor fuel and road taxes, T. 48, C. 9.

32-5-21.
Priority of expenditures from fund.

Subject to the restrictions on expenditures imposed by Code Section 32-5-23, the State Public Transportation Fund shall be expended by the department in the following order:

To pay the rentals on lease contracts entered into pursuant to the authority of the Constitution of Georgia;

To pay into the State of Georgia Guaranteed Revenue Debt Common Reserve Fund the amount of the highest annual debt service requirements for an issue of guaranteed revenue debt for public road projects initiated pursuant to Code Section 32-10-67, upon its issuance, when the guarantee of the specific issue has been authorized by an appropriation of moneys governed by Article III, Section IX, Paragraph VI(b) of the Constitution and the appropriation meets the requirements for such debt as provided by Article VII, Section IV, Paragraph III(b) of the Constitution;

To pay the costs of operating the department and for any emergencies or unusual situations;

To pay the costs necessary to comply with the conditions of federal-aid apportionments to the state for the planning, surveying, constructing, paving, and improving of the public roads in Georgia;

As directed from time to time by appropriations Acts; and

After the requirements set out in the foregoing provisions of this Code section have been met, the remainder of the State Public Transportation Fund to be expended to pay the costs of maintaining, improving, constructing, and reconstructing the public roads of the state highway system, for maintaining roads within and leading to state parks, and for constructing public roads by department forces.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-704, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 32; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 56; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1355, § 2; Ga. L. 2009, p. 976, § 11/SB 200.

32-5-22.
Other expenditures from fund.

Expenditures from the State Public Transportation Fund may be made, under such conditions as the department may provide, for streets, driveways, and parking areas located upon the property of and serving:

Public schools;

Colleges of the university system;

State agencies and governments of political subdivisions; and

Hospitals constructed with the assistance of financial grants from the federal government, authorized by Title 42, Chapter 6A, Subchapter IV, United States Code, as amended.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-705, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

32-5-23.
Limitations on expenditures from fund.

Notwithstanding Code Section 32-5-22 and except as expressly authorized elsewhere in this title, no funds from the State Public Transportation Fund shall be expended for the construction or maintenance of:

Private driveways, roads, or bridges; or

Public roads that have since been abandoned.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-706, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 32.

Cross references.

Abandonment of public roads, T. 32, C. 7.

32-5-24.
[Reserved] Authorization of expenditure for public roads serving planned communities.

History.

Repealed by Ga. L. 2015, p. 385, § 2-6/HB 252, effective July 1, 2015.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section was based on Code 1933, § 95A-706.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 1215, § 3; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 32.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 385, § 1-1/HB 252, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘J. Calvin Hill, Jr., Act.’ ”

32-5-25.
Use of fund in regard to acquisition of rights of way.

Whenever property is acquired under subsection (e) of Code Section 32-3-3, all expenses of the acquisition thereof, including the purchase price and all direct and consequential damages awarded in any proceeding brought to condemn any such right of way, shall be paid by the county in which such right of way or portion thereof is situated. When such right of way or portion thereof lies within the limits of a municipality, acquisition expenses shall be paid by such municipality unless the county concerned agrees to procure such right of way on behalf of the municipality. However, nothing contained in this Code section shall prevent the department from using the State Public Transportation Fund to acquire such right of way, to pay any damage awarded on account of the location of any road that is a part of the state highway system, or to assist a county or municipality in so doing. Furthermore, nothing in this Code section shall be construed to authorize an expenditure from the State Public Transportation Fund for the procurement of a right of way for a road to be constructed on a county road system or municipal street system except as otherwise provided by law or by agreement between the federal government and the department.

History.

Code 1933, § 95-1721, enacted by Ga. L. 1935, p. 160, § 1; Code 1933, § 95A-707, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

Cross references.

Acquisition of rights of way within municipalities for state highway system, §

32-4-90

.

32-5-26.
Reimbursement of counties and municipalities in regard to acquisition of rights of way.

The department shall be required to reimburse any county or municipality of this state the sums actually expended by it in accordance with subsection (e) of Code Section 32-3-3 where construction on the right of way so acquired by the county or municipality has not been begun within ten years from the date title to such right of way was acquired in the name of the department.

History.

Ga. L. 1947, p. 1186, § 1; Code 1933, § 95A-708, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1974, p. 1422, § 18.

32-5-27.
Allocation formula development and implementation.

The Planning Division of the department and the director of planning shall develop an allocation formula for:

A state-wide transportation asset management program;

A state-wide transportation asset improvement program; and

A local maintenance and improvement grant program.

Funds from the State Public Transportation Fund shall be allocated by the department pursuant to such formula as further defined in subsections (b) through (d) of this Code section and as appropriated by the General Assembly. Every four years, concurrent with the renewal of the state-wide strategic transportation plan, the division and the director shall update the data used in the allocation formula and shall review the distributional components of the formula and at such time may amend the formula as necessary to support implementation of the plans provided for in Code Section 32-2-22.

Funds appropriated for the state-wide transportation asset management program shall be allocated pursuant to the long-range state-wide strategic transportation plan and shall be available for administration, maintenance, operations, and rehabilitation of infrastructure.

Funds allocated for the state-wide transportation asset improvement program shall be allocated for capital construction projects, which may include new capacity, expansion of current infrastructure, safety improvements, or completion of, additions to, and capital improvement of state strategic corridors and economic development highways, including but not limited to those identified pursuant to Code Section 32-4-22. Recommendations for appropriation to the state-wide transportation asset improvement program shall include consideration of current and future regional population and regional employment. Local funding matches may be required.

A portion of this allocation shall be a specific itemized and prioritized project list and such portion shall be not less than 10 percent nor more than 20 percent of the aggregate allocation from the State Public Transportation Fund, subject to and consistent with the provisions of the state-wide transportation improvement program, for such fiscal year. In developing such project list the division and the director may accept project recommendations from the Transportation Committees of the Senate and the House of Representatives, the Governor, metropolitan planning organizations, and nonmetropolitan areas. Such projects shall be prioritized in accordance with the state-wide strategic transportation plan. The division and the director shall submit such prioritized capital construction projects to the Governor for consideration in advance of the legislative session each year. The Governor shall submit all or a portion of such capital construction project requests as part of the Governor’s budget recommendations to the General Assembly. The General Assembly may appropriate funds to any project on the prioritized project list.

In addition to the portion of the state-wide transportation asset improvement program subject to the 10 percent limitation in paragraph (2) of this subsection, additional funds from the State Public Transportation Fund may be allocated to the state-wide transportation asset improvement program that are not subject to specific project selection.

Funds allocated for the local maintenance and improvement grant program shall replace funds formerly available under the local assistance road program and state-aid program and shall be allocated by the Local Grants Division of the department to local governing authorities as grants or otherwise according to a funding formula developed by the division and the director. Such formula shall include considerations of paved and unpaved lane miles and vehicle miles traveled and may include population, employment, and local funding matches available, as well as other factors as may be determined by the division and the director. Funds allocated each fiscal year for the local maintenance and improvement grant program shall be not less than 10 percent nor more than 20 percent of the money derived from motor fuel taxes received by the state in the immediately preceding fiscal year, less the amount of refunds, rebates, and collection costs authorized by law and shall be used only for the purposes available for the proceeds of such taxes. Grants of such funds shall include provisions requiring adherence to adequate roadway standards, accounting practices, and applicable transportation plans. Additional allocations to this program from other funding sources shall be allocated subject to the requirements for usage attached to such funds.

Funds allocated or appropriated pursuant to the provisions of this Code section shall not be subject to redirection or reservation pursuant to Chapter 12 of Title 45 or to budgetary reduction except as provided by subparagraph (b) of Paragraph VI of Section IX of Article III of the Constitution.

Information pertaining to all funds received and expended by, through, or from the department, including but not limited to project numbers, let dates, estimated costs, actual costs, estimated completion date, status, priority ranking, congressional, House, and Senate districts, vendor names, contract amounts, and other pertinent contract information, shall be published on the website of the department as data in structured format. As used in this subsection, “structured format” means data that is presented in machine readable format.

History.

Code 1981, §

32-5-27

, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 976, § 12/SB 200.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2009, a comma was deleted following “the division” in the last sentence of subsection (a).

32-5-27.1.
Ten-Year Strategic Plan.

In addition to the requirements contained in Code Section 32-5-27, the department shall annually prepare and submit to the General Assembly, for approval by the Senate Transportation Committee and the House Committee on Transportation, a ten-year strategic plan that outlines the use of department resources for the upcoming fiscal years.

The Senate Transportation Committee and the House Committee on Transportation shall approve the plan and may make recommendations to the Senate Appropriations Committee and the House Committee on Appropriations for their consideration in developing the budget.

Such plan shall identify at least the following categories and establish a target percentage of resources to be expended and the respective fund sources in each of the following areas:

Construction of new highway projects;

Maintenance of existing infrastructure;

Bridge repairs and replacement;

Safety enhancements; and

Administrative expenses.

Priority shall be given to expenditure of available resources for maintenance, expansion, and improvement of highway infrastructure in the areas of this state most impacted by traffic congestion and to areas of this state in need of highway infrastructure to aid in attracting economic development to the area.

Such plan shall also bring forward all efficiencies found within the bureaucracy of the department and how those funds have been redirected to road construction.

History.

Code 1981, §

32-5-27.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 236, § 2-1/HB 170.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 236, § 8-1/HB 170, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Transportation Funding Act of 2015.’ ”

Ga. L. 2015, p. 236, § 8-2/HB 170, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “It is the intention of the General Assembly, subject to appropriations and other constitutional obligations of this state, that year to year revenue increases be prioritized to fund education, transportation, and health care in this state.”

Ga. L. 2015, p. 236, § 9-1(b)/HB 170, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “Tax, penalty, and interest liabilities and refund eligibility for prior taxable years shall not be affected by the passage of this Act and shall continue to be governed by the provisions of Title 48 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated as it existed immediately prior to the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2015.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 enactment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 261 (2015).